Maryland, session 2025, HB1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
26–202.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, membership in the Law
Enforcement Officers’ Pension System is optional for an individual described in § 26–201
of this subtitle:
(vi) who is employed by a participating governmental unit on the
effective date of participation:
2. on or after July 1, 2017, for that participating
governmental unit and who elects membership before the effective date of participation;
(2) To elect to be a member of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension
System, an individual shall file a written application with the State Retirement Agency on
a form that the State Retirement Agency provides.
(3) (i) An election to join the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension
System under this subsection is a one–time, irrevocable election.
(ii) If an individual does not elect membership during the applicable
period specified under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the individual may not
subsequently become a member of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System.
31–2A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Law enforcement officer” means an individual certified by the Maryland
Police Training and Standards Commission as a law enforcement officer.
31–2A–03.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the legislative body of an eligible
governmental unit may approve participation by its law enforcement officers, firefighters,
or emergency medical technicians in the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System if:
(1) the legislative body adopts a resolution in the form prescribed by the
Board of Trustees; and

HOUSE BILL 1320 3
(2) the eligible governmental unit participates in a State system or
operates a local plan, only if:
(i) at least 60% of the law enforcement officers, firefighters, or
emergency medical technicians of the eligible governmental unit petition to become
members of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System;
(ii) the eligible governmental unit satisfies the requirements in
subsection (b) of this section; and
(iii) the legislative body approves participation of its law enforcement
officers, firefighters, or emergency medical technicians in lieu of participation in the State
system or local plan.
(b) An eligible governmental unit that operates a local plan or participates in a
State system may approve participation of its law enforcement officers, firefighters, or
emergency medical technicians in the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System only if:
(1) the State system or local plan of the eligible governmental unit requires
member contributions at the same rate as the member contribution rate that would be
applicable to the law enforcement officers, firefighters, or emergency medical technicians
of the eligible governmental unit in the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System; or
(2) the eligible governmental unit:
(i) does not provide for the employer pickup of member
contributions to the State system or local plan within the meaning of § 414(h)(2) of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(ii) certifies that it will not become an approved employer under §
21–313 of this article on or after the effective date of participation.
(c) (1) If an eligible governmental unit does not satisfy the requirements
under subsection (b) of this section, the eligible governmental unit may submit a request to
the Board of Trustees to participate in the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System.
(2) The Board of Trustees shall consider a request made under paragraph
(1) of this subsection and determine whether any legislation is necessary to allow the
eligible governmental unit to participate in the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System.
(3) The Board of Trustees shall make recommendations to the Joint
Committee on Pensions regarding any legislation that it determines is necessary to allow
the eligible governmental unit to participate in the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension
System.
31–2A–04.

HOUSE BILL 1320
[If] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER § 31–2A–08 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF a law
enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, or paramedic joins the Law
Enforcement Officers’ Pension System on the effective date, the member is entitled to credit
for employment with the participating governmental unit before the effective date.
31–2A–08.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED AS A
LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OF THE FOREST HEIGHTS POLICE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) AN EMPLOYEE OF THE FOREST HEIGHTS POLICE DEPARTMENT WHO
ELECTS MEMBERSHIP IN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–202(B) OF THIS ARTICLE AND IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE
FOREST HEIGHTS POLICE DEPARTMENT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE SHALL RECEIVE
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE AND CREDITABLE SERVICE IN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM EQUAL TO 50% OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S PERIOD OF
EMPLOYMENT WITH THE FOREST HEIGHTS POLICE DEPARTMENT BEFORE THE
EFFECTIVE DATE AS CERTIFIED BY THE FOREST HEIGHTS POLICE DEPARTMENT AS
OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
(C) IF AN EMPLOYEE OR A FORMER EMPLOYEE OF THE FOREST HEIGHTS
POLICE DEPARTMENT BECOMES A MEMBER OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM AT ANY TIME AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE, THE
EMPLOYEE MAY NOT RECEIVE SERVICE CREDIT FOR EMPLOYMENT WITH THE
FOREST HEIGHTS POLICE DEPARTMENT BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.